Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20178-104
Director; oath; bond or insurance.

The director shall, before assuming the duties of office, take and subscribe to the constitutional oath of office, file the oath in the office of the Secretary of State, and be bonded or insured as required by section 11-201.

Laws 1933, c. 18, § 1, p. 134;

Laws 1935, c. 12, § 1, p. 81;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-1,122;

R.S.1943, § 8-101;

Laws 1947, c. 16, § 2, p. 96;

Laws 1947, c. 11, § 1, p. 75;

Laws 1951, c. 303, § 1, p. 994;

Laws 1957, c. 367, § 2, p. 1289;

Laws 1959, c. 425, § 1, p. 1427;

Laws 1961, c. 14, § 1, p. 106;

R.R.S.1943, § 8-101;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 4, p. 135;

Laws 1967, c. 20, § 2, p. 122;

Laws 1978, LB 653, § 4;

Laws 2004, LB 884, § 3;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 5.

For provisions of premium on bond of receiver, see section 25-21,218.

For provisions relating to appointment of Director of Banking and Finance, see section 81-102.

Department of Banking is a legal entity, and as receiver and liquidating agent of bank, had authority, by proceeding in court, to prosecute action to collect stockholders' liability. Department of Banking v. Foe, 136 Neb. 422, 286 N.W. 264 (1939).

Under this section, the Department of Banking is a legal entity and has authority to sue. In re Estate of Hall, 136 Neb. 417, 286 N.W. 262 (1939); Department of Banking v. Hedges, 136 Neb. 382, 286 N.W. 277 (1939).

Under 1929 act, Department of Banking was ineligible to be appointed a judicial receiver because it was not a qualified legal entity. State ex rel. Sorensen v. Hoskins State Bank, 132 Neb. 878, 273 N.W. 834 (1937).